Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-165
Military leave of absence; violation; penalty.

Any person, firm, or organization violating section 55-160 or 55-161 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and, in addition thereto, shall restore to the employee all rights of which he or she has been illegally deprived.

Laws 1957, c. 238, § 4, p. 799;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-194;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 63, p. 1602;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 51;

Laws 2002, LB 722, § 6.